Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 3 Shore Development

46-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Shore Development Act of 1956”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-1

.

46-3-2.
Declaration of purpose.

Consistent with the legislative determination and declaration of state policy to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the people as heretofore set forth in this chapter, it is hereby declared to be the intention of the state, by cooperative means providing for the acquisition, by purchase or otherwise, of lands, or any rights, title, interest, or estate in lands in beach areas vulnerable to storm damage, to assist municipalities in arresting, protecting, and preserving the beach areas from erosion and damage by the elements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-2

.

46-3-3.
“Municipality” defined.

The word
“municipality”
as used in this chapter means a city or town, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-3

.

46-3-4.
Cooperation with federal government — Prevention of erosion.

The department of environmental management is hereby designated the shore erosion authority of the state for the purpose of cooperating with the beach erosion board of the department of defense, as provided for in 33 U.S.C. § 426. The department of environmental management shall carry out investigations and studies of conditions along the shore line, harbors, rivers, and islands within the territorial waters of the state with a view to devising and projecting economical and effective methods and works for preventing or correcting beach erosion and damage to public and private property resulting therefrom.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-4

.

46-3-5.
Beach areas classed as exposed — Extent of areas.

Open beach areas, including spits, dunes, and barrier beaches that are subject to loss of material through high waves, strong currents, or scouring wave action, or beach areas vulnerable to storm damage because of geographical location, are classed as exposed beach areas within the meaning of this chapter. The limits of those exposed beach areas shall be the extent of the natural topography of the land surface, not necessarily co-extensive with political boundaries, and shall include private and public property upon which public money may be spent and public debt incurred for the protection and conservation thereof, and taxes levied to support expenditures for those purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-5

.

46-3-6.
State payments toward acquisition of exposed beach areas.

To carry out the purposes of this chapter, the state, acting through the department of environmental management, shall provide the payment for two-thirds (2/3) of the cost of acquisition by a municipality of exposed beach areas as defined in §

46-3-5

; provided, however, that the municipality has filed proper application and preliminary proposal in accordance with the provisions of this chapter on or before July 30, 1957; and provided, further, that each exposed beach area to be so acquired is certified by the department of environmental management to be endangered by erosion and to be in need of beach erosion control measures, and is found by the department of administration to be consistent with other official plans and proposed projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-6

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 61, § 27.

46-3-7.
Designation of exposed areas — Protective works.

For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, and general welfare, the city council of any city and the town council of any town, hereinafter referred to as the “legislative body,” shall have power in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, to designate the exposed beach areas, or portions thereof, requiring attention, and, subject to provisions set forth in this chapter, may construct or cause to be constructed on any lands or interests acquired pursuant to this chapter, at the expense of the municipality, any protective works designed to prevent loss of beach material and the erosion of exposed beaches, and to assess the cost of the protective works upon the owners of property benefiting from the protective works. For the purposes of this chapter, “protective works” shall include breakwaters, bulkheads, groins, jetties, riprap walls, dunes, filled areas, and other structures or results of construction activities customarily employed to correct, control, or prevent erosion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-7

.

46-3-8.
Application for state aid.

Upon the determination that any exposed beach area requires attention, the legislative body shall apply for state aid as herein provided for acquiring any land or interest therein needed, and shall request the department of environmental management to make an inspection of the area for the purpose of entering into a cooperative agreement with respect thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-8

.

46-3-9.
Cooperative agreements with municipalities.

Upon the finding that the acquisition of land or interest therein is required for the purpose of this chapter, the department of environmental management shall enter into an agreement with the legislative body to provide for the acquisition of such land or interest as aforesaid in the manner approved for its acquisition and at the price mutually acceptable for its purchase or taking. The agreement shall also set forth the existing or intended use of the exposed beach area to be protected, the scope and method to be employed by the municipality in accomplishing the results desired, and the method and means to be taken by the municipality to finance the cost for its share in acquiring the land and for installing the protective works appropriate for the area. The plans and specifications for the protective works and their construction shall require the approval of the department of environmental management.

The municipality, as a condition precedent to the acquisition of any land to be acquired by the state under the provisions of this chapter shall give satisfactory guaranty to the state that the construction and maintenance of the protective works will be carried out by it as specified in the cooperative agreement.

All contracts and agreements for the purposes of this chapter shall be approved as to form by the attorney general and as to substance by the director of the department of environmental management and the state properties committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-9

.

46-3-10.
Condemnation of property.

Whenever it is impossible to reach agreement upon the price to be paid for the purchase of any land or interest therein needed to carry out the purposes of this chapter, or whenever the owner is legally incapacitated or is absent or is unable to convey valid title or is unknown, the department of environmental management is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by condemnation any properties, notwithstanding whether the properties taken or acquired are or may be devoted to public uses. The condemnation proceedings shall be conducted and the compensation to be paid shall be ascertained and paid pursuant to the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-10

.

46-3-11.
Municipal bonds authorized.

For the purpose of financing the municipality’s share of the cost of acquiring any land or interest therein needed and for defraying the cost of the construction or installation of any structures or facilities approved for the control of beach erosion, the legislative body is authorized and empowered to issue bonds under the corporate name and seal of the municipality, bearing not more than six percent (6%) interest, per annum, payable semiannually, at such times not exceeding the normal expected life of the construction or installation of the kind and sort employed, and for such sum as may be authorized by the vote of the electors not in excess of an aggregate amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) outstanding at any one time. The bonds shall be obligatory upon the municipality in the same manner and to the same extent as other debts lawfully contracted by the municipality. The provisions of §§

45-12-2

and

45-12-11

shall not apply to any bonds issued by any municipality under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-11

.

46-3-12.
Assessments against property benefited authorized.

For the purpose of securing repayment for the construction cost borne by the municipality for any erosion control system installed or for the cost of any land or interest purchased or taken pursuant to this chapter, the legislative body is authorized and empowered to assess any property upon which taxes are now levied that is benefited by the protective works, and to fix the rate of assessments levied thereon. The assessments shall be a lien upon each property or estate so assessed in the same way and manner as other taxes assessed on real estate are liens, and, if not paid as required, shall be collected in the same manner that other taxes assessed on real estate are by law collected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-12

.

46-3-13.
Property subject to assessment — Costs included.

The legislative body may apportion and assess the part upon the lands and buildings in the municipality which, in its judgment, are especially benefited thereby, whether they abut on the erosion control system or not, and upon the owners of the lands and buildings, subject to the right of appeal. The assessment may include a proportionate share of any expenses incurred in the construction of any erosion control system, such as legal fees, service expenses, interest, and publication costs, and related incidental expenses. The legislative body may divide the total territory to be benefited in each section separately. In assessing benefits against the property in any section, the legislative body may add to the cost of the part of the erosion control system located in the section, a proportionate share of the cost of any part of the system located outside the section which is useful for the operation or effectiveness of that part of the system within the section, and of any of the other items of cost or expenses above enumerated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-13

.

46-3-14.
Apportionment of assessments.

Whenever any assessment is made as herein provided, the amount to be raised thereby shall be apportioned among the properties benefited according to such rule as the legislative body may adopt; provided that no benefits shall be assessed against any property in excess of the special benefit to accrue to the property. The legislative body may make reasonable allowances when for any reason the particular condition or situation of any property requires the allowance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-14

.

46-3-15.
Application of assessment proceeds.

The proceeds of the assessments, whether or not pledged for the payment of securities, shall be segregated from other funds of the municipality, and shall be used only to pay for the construction of the erosion control system or particular portion thereof in respect to which the assessments are made or, as the case may be, for the payment of the interest on, or principal of, any securities issued to pay for the system or particular part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-15

.

46-3-16.
Technical advice — Acquisition and supervision expense.

The department of environmental management is authorized to furnish at the request and expense of the legislative body such technical advice consisting of plans, specifications, surveys, appraisals, cost estimates, engineering, and inspection services as the legislative body may deem advisable. Whenever the legislative body contracts with the state for the acquisition of land or for the supervision and inspection of any construction undertaken by it, the expenses thereof shall be deemed part of the cost of the construction or land acquisition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-16

.

46-3-17.
Title to land acquired — Municipal contributions.

Whenever any land is purchased or otherwise acquired pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, title to the land shall be taken in the name of the state of Rhode Island and payment therefor shall be made in the first instance by the state from the appropriation provided. At the time the payment is due and payable the municipality for which the land is acquired shall pay to the state its proportionate share of the cost as set forth in §

46-3-6

. All moneys so paid to the state by any municipality for the purposes of this chapter shall be received by the general treasurer and by the treasurer deposited in a special fund. All moneys in the special fund shall be expended for the purposes of defraying the cost of land acquisition under the direction and supervision of the director of the department of environmental management with the approval of the governor, and the director is vested hereby with all powers and authority necessary or incident to the purposes of this chapter.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment out of the fund of such sum or sums as may be required from time to time upon receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-17

.

46-3-18.
Transfer of land to municipality.

Title to any land or interest therein purchased or acquired for carrying out the purposes of this chapter shall vest in the municipality for which it is acquired upon transfer of title from the state as the acquiring authority hereunder.

The transfer of title by the state and the acceptance by the municipality of any exposed beach area acquired under authority of this chapter shall hereby be expressly deemed to dedicate the property henceforth to the public use; and, subject to such stipulations as may pertain to access to and use of the land, all regulations in respect thereto shall apply alike to the citizens of the municipality and to the citizens of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3837, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

46-3-18

.

46-3-19.
Cost of construction — Federal assistance.

In the event that the federal government shall make available any funds for all or part of the construction of protective works, as defined in §

46-3-7

, the remaining portion of the cost therefor not fully covered by the federal funds may be borne by the city or town and the state; provided, however, that the state’s share shall not exceed one-third (1/3) of the total cost for the construction for the city or town; and, provided, further, however, that in no event shall the construction commence until the city or town has appropriated and made available the funds required by the city or town for those purposes, and in that event the city or town may assess the cost thereof as provided in §

46-3-7

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

46-3-19

; P.L. 1958, ch. 156, § 1.

46-3-20.
Authority of director — Federal assistance.

The director of the department of environmental management shall have full and complete authority to act as the public agency of the state, to cooperate with and assist the federal government in all matters relating to the construction of protective works in the event that the federal government shall make any federal funds or federal assistance therefor. The chief or any subordinate designated by the chief, may act as the agent of the federal government in accordance with the requirements of the provisions of any federal legislation relating to federal assistance.

The director, with the approval of the governor, is hereby authorized to accept, on behalf of the state, the provisions of the federal legislation, and may file written evidence of each acceptance with the federal government. Each acceptance shall be duly signed by the director.

The director may enter into all necessary contracts and agreements with the federal government, or any agency thereof, necessary or incident to the construction of protective works, and all contracts and agreements shall be signed in the name of the state by the director of the department of environmental management, and in that event the construction shall be carried out and executed in all respects subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal law, and the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, and to such terms, conditions, rules, and regulations, not inconsistent with federal law, rules, and regulations, as the director of the department of environmental management may establish with respect to the construction.

All money paid to the state by the federal government for the purpose of construction of protective works, shall be received by the general treasurer and deposited by the treasurer in a separate fund; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders on the general treasurer for the payment thereof, or so much thereof as may be required from time to time for such purposes, upon the receipt by the treasurer of proper vouchers signed by the director of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

46-3-20

; P.L. 1958, ch. 156, § 1.